Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-2,112
Attorney General or county attorney; discovery.

The Attorney General or any county attorney may administer oaths and affirmations, subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance, take evidence, and require the production of records including books, papers, documents, and tangible things which constitute or contain evidence relevant or material to the investigation or enforcement of the laws of this state when it reasonably appears that such action is necessary and proper. The attendance of witnesses and the production of records shall be required from any place within the State of Nebraska. Witnesses summoned by the Attorney General or a county attorney shall be paid the same fees that are paid witnesses in the courts of the State of Nebraska and mileage at the rate provided in section 81-1176.

Laws 1976, LB 583, § 3;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 221;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-709;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 174;

Laws 2008, LB952, § 2.
July 18, 2008